Washington statutes.
RCW 39.108.040

Development rights from agricultural and forestland of long-term commercial significance.

(1) An eligible county must calculate the number of development rights from agricultural and forestland of long-term commercial significance that are eligible for transfer to receiving areas. An eligible county must determine transferable development rights for allocation purposes in this program by:

(a) Base zoning in effect as of January 1, 2011; or

(b) An allocation other than base zoning as reflected by an eligible county's transfer of development rights program or an interlocal agreement with a receiving city in effect as of January 1, 2011.

(2) The number of transferable development rights includes the development rights from agricultural and forestlands of long-term commercial significance that have been previously issued under the eligible county's program for transfer of development rights, but that have not as yet been utilized to increase density or intensity in a development as of January 1, 2011.

(3) The number of transferable development rights does not include development rights from agricultural and forestlands of long-term commercial significance that have previously been removed or extinguished, such as through an existing conservation easement or mitigation or habitat restoration plan, except when consistent with subsection (2) of this section.

[ 2011 c 318 s 302.]

NOTES:

Rules—2011 c 318: See note following RCW 39.108.005.